Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 14 State Park Road Program

§ 24-14-101.
Program in addition to any existing road program.

The road maintenance program contemplated by this chapter shall be known as the “state park road program”, which shall be in addition to and not as a substitute for any federal aid, primary, secondary or state-county road construction program or any other road program now in existence.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 238, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 301.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “and farm-to-market road program” following “secondary.”

§ 24-14-102.
State park road account.

There is created a state park road account within the highway fund. The department of transportation may use the funds from the state park road account to enter into contracts and to obtain services for state park road maintenance and improvement projects, in consultation with the department of state parks and cultural resources.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 238, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.